Maryland, session 2025, SB0254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 9–932 through 9–939 and the part “Part IV. War Memorial Commission” of
Article – State Government of the Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – State Government
9–908.1.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE OVERSIGHT OF THE WAR
MEMORIAL BUILDING AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE
FOR THE MANAGEMENT OF THE WAR MEMORIAL BUILDING IN A MANNER THAT:
(I) PERMITS THE GREATEST POSSIBLE USE OF THE BUILDING
BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE AND BY PATRIOTIC ORGANIZATIONS IN THE STATE;
AND
(II) TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, PERMITS THE USE BY THE
PATRIOTIC ORGANIZATIONS WITHOUT COST.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENFORCE THE REGULATIONS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE, FOR THE MAINTENANCE AND
ADMINISTRATION OF THE BUILDING, ANY FUNDS THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR
THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE APPROPRIATE FOR THOSE
PURPOSES.
(D) THE STATE AND BALTIMORE CITY JOINTLY SHALL HOLD TITLE TO THE
WAR MEMORIAL BUILDING AND THE MEMORIAL SITE.
9–914.
(a) The powers and duties of the Trust shall rest in and be exercised by a Board
of Trustees.
(b) The Board of Trustees shall consist of the following 11 members:

SENATE BILL 254 3
(1) the Secretary, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee, who shall serve as
the chair;
(2) the Secretary of Aging, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(3) the Secretary of Labor, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Health, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Human Services, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the Adjutant General of the Military Department, ex officio, or the
Adjutant General’s designee;
(7) one representative of each of the following organizations, appointed by
the Governor:
(i) a veterans service organization;
(ii) a nonprofit organization that serves veterans; and
(iii) the business community;
(8) AS A NONVOTING TRUSTEE, a member of the House of Delegates
appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(9) AS A NONVOTING TRUSTEE, a member of the Senate appointed by the
President of the Senate.
(c) The Governor shall consider geographical balance in making appointments to
the Board of Trustees.
(d) Except for the ex officio members or their designees:
(1) the term of a member is 4 years;
(2) the terms of members are staggered as required by the terms provided
for members of the Board on July 1, 2013;
(3) at the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies;
(4) a member who is appointed after a term has begun serves for the rest
of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies; and
(5) a member may serve no more than 2 terms.

SENATE BILL 254
9–914.1.
(a) The Board shall meet at places and dates to be determined by the Board, but
not less than 2 times a year.
(b) A majority of the VOTING trustees is a quorum.
(c) A trustee:
(1) may not receive compensation as a trustee; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(d) The Department shall provide staff, supplies, and office space for the Board.
9–915.
In this Part II of this subtitle, “Commission” means the Maryland Veterans
Commission.
9–917.
(a) (1) The Commission consists of the following members appointed by the
Governor.
(2) Of the members:
(i) 1 shall be appointed AS A NONVOTING MEMBER from each [of
the 8 congressional districts in the State] COUNTY VETERAN COMMISSION;
(ii) 1 shall be a veteran appointed from the State at large;
(iii) 1 shall be a woman veteran appointed from the State at large;
(iv) 1 shall be a representative of a retired enlisted organization;
(v) 1 shall be a veteran of the Iraq or Afghanistan conflict, as defined
in § 1–202(a–1) of the Public Safety Article;
(vi) 1 shall be appointed from a list of individuals submitted to the
Governor by each of the following organizations:
[1. the American Ex–Prisoners of War, Inc.;]
[2.] 1. the American Legion;

SENATE BILL 254 5
[3.] 2. the AMVETS;
[4.] 3. the Catholic War Veterans;
[5.] 4. the Disabled American Veterans;
[6.] 5. the Fleet Reserve Association;
[7.] 6. the Jewish War Veterans;
[8.] 7. the Marine Corps League;
[9.] 8. the Maryland Military Officers Association of America;
[10.] 9. the Military Order of the Purple Heart;
[11. the Polish Legion of American Veterans;]
[12.] 10. the Veterans of Foreign Wars;
[13.] 11. the Vietnam Veterans of America;
[14.] 12. the Korean War Veterans Association, Inc.;
[15.] 13. the National Association for Black Veterans;
[16.] 14. the Colonial Chapter of the Paralyzed Veterans of
America; and
[17.] 15. the Reserve Organization of America; and
(vii) [1 shall be an honorary nonvoting member appointed from a list
of individuals submitted to the Governor by the Pearl Harbor Survivors Association] A
DESIGNEE FROM A MARYLAND NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION REPRESENTING
VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES.
(b) Each member must be a resident of the State and a veteran.
(c) (1) The term of an appointed member is 5 years.
(2) The terms of the appointed members are staggered as required by the
terms provided for members of the Commission on October 1, 1984.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.

SENATE BILL 254
(4) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(5) (I) When an organization is no longer a part of the Commission, the
appointment shall terminate at the end of the current member’s term.
(II) AN ORGANIZATION’S REPRESENTATIVE SEAT MAY BE
REMOVED IF THE ORGANIZATION FAILS TO APPOINT A NEW COMMISSIONER FOR 2
CONTINUOUS YEARS.
(6) AN ORGANIZATION MAY BE REMOVED FROM THE COMMISSION IF
A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE ORGANIZATION IS NOT RECOMMENDED BY THAT
ORGANIZATION.
(d) [A new organization may not be eligible for representation on the Commission,
by appointment of the Governor, unless it is congressionally chartered] A MAJORITY OF
THE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION IS A QUORUM.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.